Maine, session 132, LD1895.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §943, as amended by PL 2023, c. 523, Pt. A, §7 and c. 640, §2, is
further amended by enacting after the 3rd paragraph a new paragraph to read:
If the party named on the tax lien mortgage has sold or otherwise conveyed the property
to another person and provides proof of payment of that party's own pro rata share of taxes
due, the municipal treasurer or the treasurer's designee of record shall prepare and record a
discharge of the tax lien mortgage against that party in the same manner as is now provided
for the discharge of real estate mortgages, except that a facsimile signature of the treasurer
or treasurer's assignee may be used. The discharge under this paragraph is only for the
seller. The discharge of the tax lien must include a statement that the assignee, following
the release of the property, did not owe property taxes as to the released property. The
assignee of the discharge is responsible for the cost of recording the discharge. The
assignee of the discharge must be limited to the seller of the property that is the subject of
the tax lien mortgage.
Page 1 - 132LR2117(03)